Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-813
Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority; created.

There is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be known as the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority. The authority is constituted a public instrumentality, and the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function of the state.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2910;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1710;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 10.